Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Article 4. Establishment of Support Order

407.5401.
Petition to establish support order.

If a support order entitled to recognition under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this state with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if:

The individual seeking the order resides outside this state; or

The support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside this state.

The tribunal may issue a temporary child support order if the tribunal determines that such an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

A presumed father of the child;

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

Identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

An acknowledged father as provided by KRS

213.046

;

The mother of the child; or

An individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to KRS

407.5305

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 43; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 31, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5402.
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this state authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

or a law or procedure substantially similar to KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 18, § 32, effective June 24, 2015.